Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.080

Vacancy on the commission.

In the event of a vacancy on the commission, the remaining members shall recommend to the director the name of a person qualified for appointment to the vacant position. The director may appoint that person for the position or may reject the candidate and request that the commission forward the name of an additional candidate for appointment consideration by the director.

[ 2009 c 33 s 8.]